Illinois, session 104th, HB3127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Kratom 5Consumer Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. 7    (a) As used in this Act:8    "Director" means the Director of Public Health. 9    "Food" means a food, food product, food ingredient, 10dietary ingredient, dietary supplement, or beverage for human 11consumption. "Food" includes a Kratom product.12    "Kratom extract" means a food product or dietary 13ingredient containing any part of the leaf of the plant 14Mitragyna speciosa that has been extracted and concentrated in 15order to provide more standardized dosing. 16    "Kratom product" means a food product or dietary 17ingredient containing any part of the leaf of the plant 18Mitragyna speciosa, or an extract of it, that is manufactured 19as a powder, capsule, pill, beverage, or other edible product.20    "Processor" means a person who sells, prepares, 21manufactures, distributes, or maintains Kratom products or who 22advertises, represents, or holds himself or herself out as 23selling, preparing, or maintaining Kratom products.   HB3127- 2 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1    Section 10. Kratom product limitations. A processor shall 2not knowingly prepare, distribute, sell, or offer for sale any 3of the following:4        (1) A Kratom product that is adulterated with a 5    dangerous non-Kratom substance. For purposes of this Act, 6    a Kratom product is adulterated with a dangerous 7    non-Kratom substance if the Kratom product is mixed or 8    packed with a non-Kratom substance and that substance 9    affects the quality or strength of the Kratom product to 10    such a degree as to render the Kratom product injurious to 11    a consumer. 12        (2) A Kratom product that is contaminated with a 13    dangerous non-Kratom substance. For purposes of this Act, 14    a Kratom product is contaminated with a dangerous 15    non-Kratom substance if the Kratom product contains a 16    poisonous or otherwise deleterious non-Kratom ingredient, 17    including, but not limited to, the substances listed in 18    Section 204, 206, 208, 210, or 212 of the Illinois 19    Controlled Substances Act.20        (3) A Kratom extract that contains levels of residual 21    solvents higher than is allowed by United States 22    Pharmacopeia (USP) 467.23        (4) A Kratom product containing a level of 24    7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is 25    greater than 1.5% of the overall alkaloid composition of   HB3127- 3 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1    the product.2        (5) A Kratom product containing any synthetic 3    alkaloid, including, but not limited to, synthetic 4    mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other 5    synthetically derived compound of the Kratom plant.6        (6) A Kratom product that does not provide adequate 7    labeling directions necessary for safe and effective use 8    by consumers, including, but not limited to, a recommended 9    serving size. 10    Section 15. Age limits. A processor shall not knowingly 11distribute, sell, or offer for sale a Kratom product to a 12person under 21 years of age. A person who violates this 13Section shall be punished as provided in paragraph (2) of 14subsection (e) of Section 5 of the Kratom Control Act. A person 15who advertises or sells a Kratom product in a place described 16in subsections (b) and (c) of Section 10 of the Kratom Control 17Act shall be punished as provided in subsection (d) of Section 1810 of the Kratom Control Act.  19    Section 20. Violations. 20    (a) A processor who violates Section 10 is subject to an 21administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 for a first 22offense and not more than $10,000 for a second or subsequent 23offense. The penalty shall be collected by the Department of 24Public Health and deposited into the Food and Drug Safety   HB3127- 4 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1Fund. Upon the request of a person to whom an administrative 2penalty is issued, the Director shall conduct a hearing in 3accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.4    (b) A processor does not violate Section 10 if it is shown 5by a preponderance of the evidence that the processor relied 6in good faith upon the representations of a manufacturer, 7processor, packer, or distributor of food represented to be a 8Kratom product. 9    Section 90. The Kratom Control Act is amended by changing 10Section 5 and by adding Section 10 as follows: 11    (720 ILCS 642/5)12    Sec. 5. Kratom sale to or possession by minors prohibited. 13    (a) As used in this Act, "Kratom" means any parts of the 14plant Mitragyna speciosa, whether growing or not, and any 15compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 16preparation of that plant, including but not limited to 17mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine.18    (b) A person minor under 21 18 years of age shall not 19knowingly purchase or possess any product containing any 20quantity of Kratom.21    (c) A person minor under 21 18 years of age in the 22furtherance or facilitation of obtaining any product 23containing Kratom shall not knowingly display or use a false 24or forged identification card or transfer, alter, or deface an   HB3127- 5 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1identification card.2    (d) A person shall not knowingly sell, buy for, distribute 3samples of, or furnish any product containing any quantity of 4Kratom to any person minor under 21 18 years of age.5    (e) Sentence.6         (1) Violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this 7    Section is a Class B misdemeanor.8         (2) Violation of subsection (d) of this Section is a 9    Class B misdemeanor for which the offender shall be fined 10    an amount of not less than $500.11(Source: P.A. 98-981, eff. 1-1-15.) 12    (720 ILCS 642/10 new)13    Sec. 10. Kratom sales and advertisements within 1,000 feet 14of certain areas prohibited. 15    (a) In this Section, "advertise" means to engage in 16promotional activities on behalf of a product, including, but 17not limited to:18        (1) billboard, newspaper, radio, Internet, electronic 19    media, or television advertising;20        (2) the distribution of fliers or circulars; or21        (3) the display of window or interior signs.22    "Advertise" does not mean to post exterior signs 23displaying only the name of a business.24    (b) No person or entity shall advertise a product 25containing any quantity of Kratom, in any form or medium,   HB3127- 6 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1within 1,000 feet of the perimeter of school grounds, a 2playground, a recreation center or facility, a child care 3center, a public park or public library, or a game arcade that 4admits persons under 21 years of age.5    (c) No person or entity shall sell a product containing 6any quantity of Kratom, in any form or medium, within 1,000 7feet of the perimeter of school grounds, a playground, a 8recreation center or facility, a child care center, a public 9park or public library, or a game arcade that admits persons 10under 21 years of age.11    (d) A violation of this Section is a business offense 12punishable by a fine not to exceed $5,000.  HB3127- 7 -LRB104 08035 RLC 18081 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    720 ILCS 642/55    720 ILCS 642/10 new